Utah statutes.
63M-1-2612.   Private Proposal Restricted Special Revenue Fund -- Fees.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund within the office called the Private Proposal Restricted Special Revenue Fund.

(2)  Money collected from the payment of a fee required by this part shall be deposited in the Private Proposal Restricted Special Revenue Fund.

(3)  The board or the committee may use the money in the Private Proposal Restricted Special Revenue Fund to offset:

(a)  the expense of hiring staff and engaging any outside consultant to review a proposal under this part; and

(b)  any expense incurred by the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget or the affected department in the fulfillment of its duties under this part.

(4)  The board shall establish a fee in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for:

(a)  reviewing an initial proposal;

(b)  reviewing any detailed proposal; and

(c)  preparing any project agreement.

(5)  The board may waive the fee established under Subsection (4) if the board determines that it is:

(a)  reasonable; and

(b)  in the best interest of the state.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

